src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-toll_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - toll â-stem : # Noun 'fire' - full paradigm
# 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
# 1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst. â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
# 1.1.1 Sg.Ill in ʹ-e
# 1.1.1.1 Has Gradation
# 1.1.1.1.1 Monophthong
# 1.1.1.1.1.1 Homogenous Consonant
# 1.1.1.1.1.1.2 Sg.Nom Extra Strong Grade
# 1.1.1.1.1.1.2.1.Sg.Gen Weak Grade
# 1.1.1.1.1.1.2.1.3 Sg.Ill Extra Strong Grade
     toll+N+Sg+Nom: toll
     toll+N+Sg+Gen: tool
     toll+N+Sg+Acc: tool
     toll+N+Sg+Ill: toʹlle
     toll+N+Sg+Loc: toolâst
     toll+N+Sg+Com: toolin
     toll+N+Ess: tollân
     toll+N+Par: tollâd
     toll+N+Sg+Abe: [tooltaa, tooltää]
     toll+N+Pl+Nom: tool
     toll+N+Pl+Gen: tooli
     toll+N+Pl+Acc: toolid
     toll+N+Pl+Ill: toolid
     toll+N+Pl+Loc: toolin
     toll+N+Pl+Com: toolivuiʹm
     toll+N+Pl+Abe: [toolitaa, toolitää]
     toll+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: toolâž
